Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-504
Design-build contract; progressive design-build contract; construction manager-general contractor contract; authorized.

The department, in accordance with the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act, may solicit and execute a design-build contract, a progressive design-build contract, or a construction manager-general contractor contract for a public surface water or groundwater-related infrastructure project.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 4.